Utah statutes.
73-5a-203.   Review of plans.
(1)  The state engineer shall establish a formal written procedure for the
review of plans submitted pursuant to Section 73-5a-202.  Plans shall be
reviewed according to:
(a)  design criteria which the state engineer shall specify in rules; and
(b)  data or criteria generally accepted by the general dam design community.
(2)  Upon review of the plans, the state engineer will:
(a)  approve them with appropriate conditions;
(b)  reject them; or
(c)  return them for correction.
(3)  The state engineer shall document each review indicating:
(a)  how the plans were reviewed; and
(b)  his evaluation of the plans.
